Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2858.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings. The General Assembly finds and declares:
(1) There is a significant regulatory gap in the oversight of eyelash services, including the
application, removal, and add-on of eyelash extensions, as well as lash lifts and tinting.
(2) The Rhode Island department of health receives in excess of one hundred fifty (150)
complaints annually relating to cosmetology establishments, with approximately ninety percent
(90%) concerning eyelash services, including improper adhesive use, infections, and vision-related
injuries.
(3) The department currently maintains limited inspection capacity relative to the number
of licensed establishments statewide.
(4) The purpose of this chapter is to protect public health and safety by establishing
licensure standards, business permitting requirements, inspection authority, and enforcement
mechanisms for eyelash services.
SECTION 2. Title 5 of the General Laws entitled "BUSINESSES AND PROFESSIONS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 97
EYELASH SERVICES LICENSING AND REGULATION ACT
5-97-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Eyelash Services Licensing and

Regulation Act."
5-97-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Department" means the Rhode Island department of health.
(2) "Division" means the division of professional regulation within the department of labor
and training.
(3) "Establishment" means any retail shop, salon, or facility where eyelash services are
provided to the public.
(4) "Eyelash services" means the application, removal, and add-on of eyelash extensions,
as well as lash lifts and eyelash tinting.
(5) "Eyelash service technician" means a person licensed pursuant to this chapter to provide
eyelash services.
5-97-3. License required for eyelash service technicians.
(a) No person shall engage in the practice of eyelash services for compensation unless
licensed as an eyelash service technician pursuant to this chapter.
(b) An applicant for licensure shall:
(1) Submit an application to the division on a form prescribed by the division;
(2) Pay an application fee of one hundred dollars ($100);
(3) Provide evidence of completion of not less than fifty (50) hours of instruction in eyelash
services at a cosmetology school approved by the state;
(4) Successfully pass a written examination and a practical examination administered or
approved by the State of Rhode Island; and
(5) Meet such additional education, training, and competency standards as may be
established by regulation.
(c) A license issued under this chapter shall authorize the individual to perform only
eyelash services and shall not authorize the practice of cosmetology, esthetics, or any other licensed
profession.
5-97-4. Establishment license and permit required.
(a) Any establishment offering eyelash services shall obtain:
(1) A retail license issued by the appropriate municipal authority, if required; and
(2) A permit and license to operate issued by the department.
(b) The licensed technician and/or business owner operating the establishment shall ensure
that the establishment complies with all health, sanitation, and safety standards established by rules
and regulations promulgated by the department or the division.
LC005847 - Page 2 of 4

(c) No establishment shall employ or permit an unlicensed individual to perform eyelash
services.
5-97-5. Regulatory authority.
(a) The department shall have authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
implement and enforce the provisions of this chapter including, but not limited to, standards for
sanitation, infection control, adhesive use, ventilation, recordkeeping, and consumer protection.
(b) The department may conduct inspections of licensed establishments and shall
investigate complaints.
(c) The department is authorized to assess administrative fines for violations of this chapter
or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.
(d) Revenue derived from fines and fees under this chapter shall be deposited into a
restricted receipt account within the department to support enforcement activities, including
inspection capacity, and to offset regulatory costs.
5-97-6. Penalties.
(a) Any individual who practices as an eyelash service technician without a valid license
issued pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to an administrative fine of five hundred dollars
($500) per violation.
(b) Any facility or business owner operating an establishment offering eyelash services
without proper licensure or permit shall be subject to an administrative fine of five hundred dollars
($500) per violation.
(c) Each day of continued noncompliance shall constitute a separate violation.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005847
========
LC005847 - Page 3 of 4